Massachusetts, session 194th, H135.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding at the end thereof the following:-
Section 18. All state and regional agencies, boards and commissions shall, before any
rule, regulation, or other regulatory requirement is promulgated, make public and post in writing
whether such rule, regulation, or other regulatory requirement will potentially have an adverse
impact on commercial agricultural operations based in the Commonwealth. For the purposes of
this section, “agricultural” shall mean pertaining to agriculture as defined in section one A of
chapter one hundred and twenty-eight. Further, if such rule, regulation, or other regulatory
requirement is determined to have such a potential impact on agriculture, the responsible agency,
board, or commission, in conjunction with the department of food and agriculture, shall conduct
of 2

an impact assessment to determine the extent of such impact, including, but not limited to, the
effect on future land use and related environmental impacts, including costs, and submit to the
joint committee on natural resources and agriculture and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means a copy of their findings at least forty-five days prior to promulgation.
All city and town agencies, boards, and commissions shall, before enacting any rule,
regulation, law, bylaw, ordinance, or other regulatory requirement that will potentially have an
adverse impact on commercial agricultural operations based in the Commonwealth, complete a
form prescribed by the department of food and agriculture at least ninety days prior to final
enactment of the regulatory requirement. In the case of by-laws, ordinances, and other
requirements subject to review by the Attorney General, such form shall be submitted to the
department of food and agriculture on the same date a by-law, ordinance, or other requirement is
submitted to the Attorney General. No regulatory action described in this section, except those of
an emergency nature expiring in six months or less for the purposes of protecting health and
safety of persons, shall take effect until the provisions of this section have been complied with.
If the impact assessment yields that such proposed rule, regulation, or other regulatory
requirement will have a negative impact of $500 per year and/or 20 hours per year in labor in
cost a copy of these findings shall be submitted to the board of agriculture for comments and
suggestions to mitigate such cost or negative impact and their findings are to be returned to the
joint committee on natural resources and agriculture and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means no more than 15 days prior to promulgation.
of 2